Oklahoma, session 2025, SB731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 2803.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 104, O.S.L. 2024 (12 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 2803.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2803.1. A. The following statements are admissible in
juvenile deprived proceedings and pre-trial and post-trial criminal
and juvenile delinquent proceedings including preliminary hearings,
prosecutive merit hearings, and hearings on the revocation of
probation or acceleration of a deferred judgment:
1. A statement made by a child who has not attained sixteen
(16) years of age at the time the statement is made, a child sixteen
(16) years of age or older who has a disability, or a person who is
an incapacitated person or vulnerable adult as defined by Section
10-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, which describes any
act of physical abuse, domestic abuse, neglect, enabling physical
abuse or neglect against the child or, incapacitated person, or

vulnerable adult or any act of sexual contact, any conduct
proscribed by Sections 741, 745, 748, 843.1, 843.2, 843.3, 843.4,
843.5, or 1111, 1111.1, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118,
1119, 1123, or 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, performed
with or on the child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult
by another, or any act or omission resulting in great bodily injury
to the child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult; and
2. A statement made by a child who has not attained sixteen
(16) years of age at the time the statement is made, a child sixteen
(16) years of age or older who has a disability, or a person who is
an incapacitated person or vulnerable adult as defined by Section
10-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, which describes any
act of physical abuse, neglect, or enabling physical abuse or
neglect against another child or, incapacitated person, or
vulnerable adult, any act of sexual contact with another child or,
incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult, any conduct proscribed by
Sections 741, 745, 748, 843.1, 843.2, 843.3, 843.4, 843.5, or 1111,
1111.1, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1123, or
1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any act of domestic
abuse, or any act or omission resulting in death or great bodily
injury to a human being, provided that the child or, incapacitated
person, or vulnerable adult witnessed the act or omission.
B. The following statements are admissible in criminal and
juvenile delinquent trials if the child or, incapacitated person, or
vulnerable adult testifies at the trial whether in person, via
videoconferencing equipment, or other alternative means; if the
child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult does not testify
at the trial and is unavailable as defined by subsection A of
Section 2804 of this title and the requirements for admissibility
pursuant to subsection B of Section 2804 of this title are
satisfied; or if the child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable
adult does not testify at the trial and the court determines that
the statement is nontestimonial:
1. A statement made by a child who has not attained sixteen
(16) years of age at the time the statement is made, a child sixteen
(16) years of age or older who has a disability, or a person who is
an incapacitated person or vulnerable adult as defined by Section
10-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, which describes any
act of physical abuse, domestic abuse, neglect, enabling physical
ENR. S. B. NO. 731 Page 2

abuse or neglect against the child or, incapacitated person, or
vulnerable adult or any act of sexual contact, any conduct
proscribed by Sections 741, 745, 748, 843.1, 843.2, 843.3, 843.4,
843.5, or 1111, 1111.1, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118,
1119, 1123, or 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, performed
with or on the child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult
by another, or any act or omission resulting in great bodily injury
to the child or, incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult; and
2. A statement made by a child who has not attained sixteen
(16) years of age at the time the statement is made, a child sixteen
(16) years of age or older who has a disability, or a person who is
an incapacitated person or vulnerable adult as defined by Section
10-103 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes, which describes any
act of physical abuse, neglect, or enabling physical abuse or
neglect against another child or, incapacitated person, or
vulnerable adult, any act of sexual conduct with another child or,
incapacitated person, or vulnerable adult, any conduct proscribed by
Sections 741, 745, 748, 843.1, 843.2, 843.3, 843.4, 843.5, or 1111,
1111.1, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1123, or
1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any act of domestic
abuse, or any act or omission resulting in death or great bodily
injury to a human being, provided that the child or, incapacitated
person, or vulnerable adult witnessed the act or omission.
C. The provisions of the Oklahoma Criminal Discovery Code,
Section 2002 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall govern the
disclosure and notice requirements of statements offered pursuant to
this section.
D. As used in this section, “disability” means a physical or
mental impairment which substantially limits one or more of the
major life activities of the child or the child is regarded as
having such an impairment by a competent medical professional.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 731 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 731 Page 4